Ohio, session 136, HB872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) There is hereby established the Ohio Economic Task Force on Gun Violence and Violent Crimes. The Task Force shall consist of the following members: (1) The Governor or the Governor's designee; (2) The Attorney General or the Attorney General's designee; (3) The Director of Development; (4) Five members of the Ohio business community, all appointed by the Director of Development; (5) Three members of the House of Representatives, two from the majority party, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one from the minority party, appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives; (6) Three members of the Senate, two from the majority party, appointed by the President of the Senate, and one from the minority party, appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate; (7) Two members of the community who work to reduce violent crime, one appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one appointed by the Senate President. (B) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, the Task Force shall meet to select from its members a chairperson or co-chairpersons. Thereafter, the Task Force shall meet at the call of the chairperson or either co-chairperson, but not less than monthly. (C) Members of the Task Force shall serve without compensation except to the extent that serving on the Task Force is considered part of the member's regular duties of employment. (D) The Task Force shall examine all of the following: (1) The economic impact of gun violence and violent crime on businesses and workforce development including associated costs across this state; (2) The economic impact of gun violence and violent crime on community investments using violent crime data; (3) Best practices that are available to reduce violent crime; (4) Community revitalization efforts that can be implemented to prevent violent crime. (E) Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the Task Force shall prepare a report detailing its findings and recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Upon submission of this report, the Task Force ceases to exist.